Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.378

Executive board—Appointment of administrative auditor—Retention of firm for performance audits—Duties of auditor and firm—Reports.

The executive board of any operating agency constructing, operating, terminating, or decommissioning a nuclear power plant under a site certification agreement issued pursuant to chapter 80.50 RCW shall appoint an administrative auditor. The administrative auditor shall be deemed an officer under chapter 42.23 RCW. The appointment of the administrative auditor shall be in addition to the appointment of the auditor for the issuance of warrants and other purposes as provided in RCW 43.52.375. The executive board shall retain a qualified firm or firms to conduct performance audits which is in fact independent and does not have any interest, direct or indirect, in any contract with the operating agency other than its employment hereunder. No member or employee of any such firm shall be connected with the operating agency as an officer, employee, or contractor. The administrative auditor and the firm or firms shall be independently and directly responsible to the executive board of the operating agency. The executive board shall require a firm to conduct continuing audits of the methods, procedures and organization used by the operating agency to control costs, schedules, productivity, contract amendments, project design and any other topics deemed desirable by the executive board. The executive board may also require a firm to analyze particular technical aspects of the operating agency's projects and contract amendments. The firm or firms shall provide advice to the executive board in its management and control of the operating agency. At least once each year, the firm or firms shall prepare and furnish a report of its actions and recommendations to the executive board for the purpose of enabling it to attain the highest degree of efficiency in the management and control of any thermal power project under construction or in operation. The administrative auditor shall assist the firm or firms in the performance of its duties. The administrative auditor and the firm or firms shall consult regularly with the executive board and furnish any information or data to the executive board which the administrative auditor, firm, or executive board deems helpful in accomplishing the purpose above stated. The administrative auditor shall perform such other duties as the executive board shall prescribe to accomplish the purposes of this section.

Upon the concurrent request of the chairs of the senate or house energy and utilities committees, the operating agency shall report to the committees on a quarterly basis.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5138; 1987 c 505 s 84; 1986 c 158 s 13; 1982 1st ex.s. c 43 s 8; 1981 1st ex.s. c 3 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 220 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—Savings—1982 1st ex.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.52.374.